Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 29.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-1029
Verification of work eligibility
status.

A
municipality shall not approve or grant to any person any incentive under
the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act unless
the taxpayer provides evidence satisfactory to the municipality that the taxpayer
electronically verified the work eligibility status of all newly hired employees
employed in Nebraska.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 29.